Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.52.330

Constitutional amendments and state measures—Notice method.

Subject to the availability of funds appropriated specifically for that purpose, the secretary of state shall publish notice of the proposed constitutional amendments and other state measures that are to be submitted to the people at a state general election up to four times during the four weeks immediately preceding that election in every legal newspaper in the state. The secretary of state shall supplement this publication with an equivalent amount of radio and television advertisements.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1311. Prior: 1997 c 405 s 1; 1967 c 96 s 1; 1965 c 9 s 29.27.072; prior: 1961 c 176 s 1. Formerly RCW 29.27.072.]